Tennessee, session 114, HB0489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-36-105(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) Conduct statewide public education concerning the purposes and goals of
this chapter and submit a report by February 1 of each year, to the committee of the
house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to criminal
justice, judiciary committee of the senate, and fiscal review committee regarding the
effectiveness of diversion of offenders from state correctional institutions;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0489
001802
- 1 -